Utah statutes.
57-13a-101.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Water conveyance" means a canal, ditch, pipeline, or other means of
conveying water.
(2)  "Water user" means a water user or the water user's predecessor whose
water being conveyed is represented by a water right recognized under state
law or by shares in a mutual irrigation company.
